pl: Przydatność brokatu: Do świec i mydeł; Kosmetyczny (bezpieczny dla ciała i twarzy); Tylko do rękodzieła; Bezpieczny dla żywności (brokat jadalny); Bezpieczny dla włosów; Bezpieczny do paznokci; Bezpieczny do żywicy; Inne
ja: グリッターの使用適性: キャンドル/石鹸に使用可; 化粧品グレード (ボディ/フェイスに使用可); クラフト専用; 食品用 (食用グリッター); 髪に使用可; ネイルアートに使用可; レジンに使用可; その他
zh-CN: 闪粉适用场景: 蜡烛/肥皂安全; 化妆品级（身体/面部安全）; 仅供工艺品使用; 食品安全（食用闪粉）; 头发安全; 美甲安全; 树脂安全; 其他
fi: Kimalteen käyttökelpoisuus: Sopii kynttilöille/saippualle; Kosmetiikkalaatu (turvallinen vartalolle/kasvoille); Vain askarteluun; Elintarvikekäyttöön sopiva (syötävä glitter); Turvallinen hiuksille; Turvallinen kynsitaiteelle; Turvallinen hartsille; Muu
nl: Glitter gebruiksgeschiktheid: Veilig voor kaarsen/zeep; Cosmetische kwaliteit (veilig voor lichaam/gezicht); Alleen voor knutselgebruik; Voedselveilig (eetbare glitter); Veilig voor haar; Veilig voor nailart; Veilig voor hars; Overig
en: Glitter use suitability: Candle/soap-safe; Cosmetic grade (body/face-safe); Craft use only; Food-safe (edible glitter); Hair-safe; Nail art-safe; Resin-safe; Other
el: Καταλληλότητα χρήσης γκλίτερ: Ασφαλές για κεριά/σαπούνια; Καλλυντικής ποιότητας (ασφαλές για σώμα/πρόσωπο); Μόνο για χειροτεχνίες; Ασφαλές για τρόφιμα (βρώσιμο γκλίτερ); Ασφαλές για μαλλιά; Ασφαλές για nail art; Ασφαλές για ρητίνη; Άλλο
nb: Egnethet for bruk av glitter: Trygg for lys/såpe; Kosmetisk kvalitet (trygg for kropp/ansikt); Kun for hobbybruk; Matsikker (spiselig glitter); Trygg for hår; Trygg for negledesign; Trygg for resin; Annet
bg-BG: Предназначение на броката: Подходящ за свещи/сапуни; Козметичен клас (подходящ за тяло/лице); Само за занаяти; Подходящ за храна (ядим брокат); Подходящ за коса; Подходящ за маникюр; Подходящ за смола; Друго
ru: Область применения блесток: Подходит для свечей/мыла; Косметический (безопасен для тела/лица); Только для поделок; Пищевой (съедобный глиттер); Безопасен для волос; Подходит для нейл-арта; Подходит для эпоксидной смолы; Другое
sv: Lämplighet för glitteranvändning: Säker för ljus/tvål; Kosmetisk kvalitet (säker för kropp/ansikte); Endast för pyssel; Livsmedelssäker (ätbart glitter); Säker för hår; Säker för nagelkonst; Säker för harts; Övrigt
lt-LT: Blizgučių naudojimo tinkamumas: Tinkamas žvakėms / muilui; Kosmetinis (saugus kūnui / veidui); Tik rankdarbiams; Saugus maistui (valgomi blizgučiai); Saugus plaukams; Saugus nagų dailei; Tinkamas naudoti su derva; Kita
ko: 글리터 사용 적합성: 캔들/비누용 안전; 화장품 등급(바디/얼굴용 안전); 공예 전용; 식품 안전(식용 글리터); 헤어용 안전; 네일 아트용 안전; 레진용 안전; 기타
pt-PT: Adequação do uso de glitter: Seguro para velas/sabonetes; Grau cosmético (seguro para corpo/rosto); Apenas para artesanato; Seguro para alimentos (purpurina comestível); Seguro para o cabelo; Seguro para arte de unhas; Seguro para resina; Outra
de: Eignung des Glitzers für bestimmte Anwendungen: Geeignet für Kerzen/Seifen; Kosmetische Qualität (sicher für Körper/Gesicht); Nur für Bastelzwecke; Lebensmittelecht (essbarer Glitzer); Sicher für Haare; Sicher für Nailart; Sicher für Kunstharz; Sonstige
cs: Vhodnost použití třpytek: Bezpečné pro svíčky/mýdla; Kosmetická kvalita (bezpečné pro tělo/obličej); Pouze pro řemeslné využití; Bezpečné pro potraviny (jedlé třpytky); Bezpečné pro vlasy; Bezpečné pro zdobení nehtů; Bezpečné pro pryskyřici; Ostatní
es: Idoneidad del uso de brillantina: Seguro para velas/jabones; Grado cosmético (seguro para cuerpo/rostro); Solo para uso en manualidades; Seguro para alimentos (purpurina comestible); Seguro para el cabello; Seguro para el arte de uñas; Seguro para resina; Otro
sk-SK: Vhodnosť použitia trblietok: Bezpečné pre sviečky/mydlá; Kozmetická kvalita (bezpečné pre telo/tvár); Iba na remeselné použitie; Bezpečné pre potraviny (jedlé trblietky); Bezpečné pre vlasy; Bezpečné pre nechtový dizajn; Bezpečné do živice; Iné
zh-TW: 亮粉適用用途: 蠟燭/肥皂安全; 化妝品等級 (身體/臉部安全); 僅限手工藝用; 食品安全 (食用亮片); 頭髮安全; 美甲安全; 樹脂安全; 其他
it: Idoneità all'uso dei glitter: Sicuro per candele/saponi; Uso cosmetico (sicuro per corpo/viso); Solo per uso artigianale; Sicuro per alimenti (glitter commestibile); Sicuro per capelli; Sicuro per nail art; Sicuro per resina; Altro
hu: Csillám használatára való alkalmasság: Gyertyához/szappanhoz biztonságos; Kozmetikai minőség (testre/arcra biztonságos); Csak kézműves célra; Élelmiszerbiztos (ehető csillámpor); Hajra biztonságos; Körömdíszítéshez biztonságos; Műgyantához biztonságos; Egyéb
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru utilizarea sclipiciului: Sigur pentru lumânări/săpun; Uz cosmetic (sigur pentru corp/față); Doar pentru artizanat; Sigur pentru alimente (sclipici comestibil); Sigur pentru păr; Sigur pentru unghii (nail art); Sigur pentru rășină; Altele
th: ความเหมาะสมในการใช้กากเพชร: ปลอดภัยสำหรับเทียน/สบู่; เกรดเครื่องสำอาง (ปลอดภัยสำหรับผิวกาย/ผิวหน้า); สำหรับงานประดิษฐ์เท่านั้น; ปลอดภัยสำหรับอาหาร (กลิตเตอร์กินได้); ปลอดภัยสำหรับเส้นผม; ปลอดภัยสำหรับการเพ้นท์เล็บ; ปลอดภัยสำหรับเรซิน; อื่นๆ
tr: Simin kullanım uygunluğu: Mum/sabun için güvenli; Kozmetik sınıf (vücut/yüz için güvenli); Yalnızca el işi kullanımı; Gıdaya uygun (yenilebilir sim); Saç için güvenli; Tırnak süslemesi için güvenli; Reçine için güvenli; Diğer
vi: Tính phù hợp khi sử dụng kim tuyến: An toàn cho nến/xà phòng; Cấp độ mỹ phẩm (an toàn cho cơ thể/mặt); Chỉ dùng cho thủ công; An toàn thực phẩm (kim tuyến ăn được); An toàn cho tóc; An toàn cho nghệ thuật vẽ móng; An toàn cho resin; Khác
da: Glimmers anvendelsesegnethed: Sikker til stearinlys/sæbe; Kosmetisk kvalitet (sikker til krop/ansigt); Kun til hobbybrug; Fødevaresikker (spiseligt glitter); Sikker til hår; Sikker til neglekunst; Sikker til resin; Andet
fr: Adéquation des paillettes à l’usage prévu: Sans danger pour bougies/savons; Qualité cosmétique (sans danger pour le corps/visage); Usage artisanal uniquement; Qualité alimentaire (paillettes comestibles); Sans danger pour les cheveux; Sans danger pour la décoration des ongles; Sans danger pour la résine; Autre
pt-BR: Adequação de uso do glitter: Seguro para velas/sabonetes; Grau cosmético (seguro para corpo/rosto); Apenas para artesanato; Seguro para alimentos (glitter comestível); Seguro para o cabelo; Seguro para unhas artísticas; Seguro para resina; Outro
sl-SI: Primernost uporabe bleščic: Varno za sveče/mila; Kozmetična kakovost (varno za telo/obraz); Samo za ustvarjanje; Varno za živila (užitne bleščice); Varno za lase; Varno za urejanje nohtov; Varno za smolo; Drugo
hr-HR: Prikladnost uporabe šljokica: Sigurno za svijeće/sapune; Kozmetička kvaliteta (sigurno za tijelo/lice); Samo za rukotvorine; Sigurno za hranu (jestive šljokice); Sigurno za kosu; Sigurno za ukrašavanje noktiju; Sigurno za smolu; Ostalo